District of Columbia statutes.
32-202

Employment of minors under 18 years of age; hours of employment; notice to be posted in place of employment; list of minors employed.

Except as provided in § 32-206, no minor under 18 years of age shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work in, about, or in connection with any gainful occupation, except in agricultural work, or housework, or in the distribution or sale of newspapers, as prescribed in § 32-201, and except in newspaper stuffing, subject to the provisions of § 32-215, more than 6 consecutive days in any 1 week, or more than 48 hours in any 1 week, or more than 8 hours in any 1 day, nor shall any minor 16 or 17 years of age be employed, permitted, or suffered to work before 6:00 a.m. or after 10:00 p.m. of any day; nor shall any minor under 16 years of age be employed, permitted, or suffered to work before 7:00 a.m. or after 7:00 p.m. of any day, except during the summer (June 1 through Labor Day) when the evening hour shall be 9:00. Every employer shall post and keep conspicuously posted in the establishment, in or about which any minor is employed, permitted, or suffered to work, a printed notice, furnished by the official authorized to enforce this subchapter, setting forth the legal regulations governing the employment and hours of work of minors and occupations prohibited to minors in such establishments, and, in addition, shall keep accessible in the place of employment a list of minors under 18 employed, permitted, or suffered to work, and an accurate time record showing the hours of beginning and ending work each day. The presence of any such minor in the place of work for a longer time in the day or week than stated in the printed regulation hours shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of the provisions of this section.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 999, ch. 908, § 2
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(2), 23 DCR 512
1981 Ed., § 36-502.
1973 Ed., § 36-202.